Florida, session 2026, HB4013.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (3) of section 2 of section 3 of
chapter 2000-384, Laws of Florida, is amended to read:
Section 2. District creation; status; charter amendments;
boundaries.—
(3) The lands to be included within the district are the
following described lands in Lee County:

In Township 45 South, Range 24 East, the unincorporated
portions of Section 2 and 3, all of Sections 9 and 10, the
west half ( 1/2) of the northwest quarter ( 1/4) and the
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4013 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4013 2026 Legislature
west half ( 1/2) of the southwest quarter ( 1/4) of Section
11, all of Sections 15 and 16, the east half ( 1/2) of
Section 17, all of sections 20, 21, 22, 27, 28, 29, 30, 31,
32, 33, 34, and in Township 46 South, Range 24 East, that
portion of Section 2 lying west of the waters of Hendry
Creek, all of sections 3, 4, 5, 6, the north half ( 1/2) of
7, all of sections 8, 9, 10, those portions of sections 11
and 14 lying west of the waters of Hendry Creek, all of
sections 15, 16, 17, 22, that portion of Section 23 lying
west of the waters of Hendry Creek, and in Township 45
South, Range 23 East, the south half ( 1/2) of Section 25,
the south half ( 1/2) of Section 27, the southeast quarter
( 1/4) of Section 28, all of sections 33, 34, 35, 36, and
in Township 46 South, Range 23 East, all of Sections 1, 2,
3, 4, 9, 10, 11, and 12 less and except the southeast
quarter ( 1/4) thereof, the west half ( 1/2) of 13, and the
east half ( 1/2) of 14 less and except that portion located
within the territorial limits, of the Fort Myers Beach Fire
Control District, and less and except that portion of all
the above described lands located within the municipal
boundaries of the City of Fort Myers.

TOGETHER WITH

All that part of Lee County that is located and situated
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4013 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4013 2026 Legislature
within San Carlos Island; Estero Island; Easterly One-Half
(1/2) of Section 13, Township 46 South, Range 23 East;
Section 18, Township 46 South, Range 24 East; and section
7, Township 46 South, Range 24 East except that part which
is located and situated north of the old railroad grade.
Section 2. Chapters 2000-422 and 2008-275, Laws of
Florida, are repealed.
Section 3. Transition.—
(1) As of the effective date of this act, the Fort Myers
Beach Fire Control District is merged into the Iona-McGregor
Fire Protection and Rescue Service District. The Board of
Commissioners of the Iona-McGregor Fire Protection and Rescue
Service District, as provided in this act and chapter 2000-384,
Laws of Florida, shall serve as the governing body of the
district and is authorized to exercise all powers that may be
exercised by the board pursuant to chapter 2000-384, Laws of
Florida.
(2) Notwithstanding s. 191.005, Florida Statutes, and
chapter 97-340, Laws of Florida, from the effective date of this
act until the next general election, the governing body of the
Iona-McGregor Fire Protection and Rescue Service District shall
be composed of the five members of the Iona-McGregor Fire
Protection and Rescue Service District Board of Commissioners as
of the effective date of this act and the two members of the
governing board of the Fort Myers Beach Fire Control District
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4013 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4013 2026 Legislature
elected pursuant to chapter 2000-422, Laws of Florida, whose
terms expire at the 2028 general election.
(3) All assets and liabilities, including any pension
liabilities, of the Fort Myers Beach Fire Control District as of
the effective date of this act shall be transferred to the Iona-
McGregor Fire Protection and Rescue Service District.
Section 4. Referendum.—
(1) The referendum election called for by this act shall
be held on November 3, 2026, concurrent with the 2026 general
election.
(2) The ballot title for the referendum question shall be
in substantially the following form:

MERGER OF FORT MYERS BEACH AND IONA-MCGREGOR FIRE CONTROL AND
RESCUE SERVICE DISTRICTS
(3) The referendum question shall be placed on the ballot
in substantially the following form:

Shall Chapter 2026- , Laws of Florida, amending the boundaries
of the Iona-McGregor Fire Protection and Rescue Service District
to include all territories currently included in the Fort Myers
Beach Fire Control District, abolishing the Fort Myers Beach
Fire Control District, providing for a transitional board, and
transferring the assets and liabilities of the Fort Myers Beach
100 Fire Control District to the Iona-McGregor Fire Protection and
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4013 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4013 2026 Legislature
101 Rescue Service District, become effective?
102 ( ) YES.
103 ( ) NO.
104 (4) In the event this question is answered affirmatively
105 by a majority of the qualified voters in each district voting in
106 the referendum, this act shall take effect. The referendum
107 election shall be conducted by the Supervisor of Elections of
108 Lee County in accordance with the Florida Election Code.
109 Section 5. This act shall take effect upon its approval by
110 a majority vote of those qualified electors of the Fort Myers
111 Beach Fire Control District and the Iona-McGregor Fire
112 Protection and Rescue Service District voting in a referendum to
113 be held on November 3, 2026, except that this section and
114 section 4 shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4013 -01-er